Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-614
Marriage licenses; amendment; department; county clerk; duties.

As soon as possible after completion of an amendment to a marriage license by the department, the department shall forward a noncertified copy of the marriage license reflecting the amendment to the county clerk of the county in which the license was filed. Upon receipt of the amended copy, the county clerk shall make the necessary changes on the marriage license on file in his or her office to reflect the amendment.

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. VI, art. II, div. IX, § 16, p. 784;

C.S.1922, § 8246;

Laws 1927, c. 166, § 10, p. 452;

C.S.1929, § 71-2418;

R.S.1943, § 71-614;

Laws 1959, c. 323, § 2, p. 1180;

Laws 1967, c. 443, § 1, p. 1383;

Laws 1967, c. 444, § 1, p. 1385;

Laws 1977, LB 73, § 1;

Laws 1986, LB 525, § 13;

Laws 1992, LB 1019, § 53;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 525;

Laws 1997, LB 307, § 141;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 414;

Laws 2021, LB93, § 1.